Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4701
Act, how cited.

Sections 30-4701 to 30-4715 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 1.